Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 4
ELECTIONS - ACCESS TO BALLOT BY CANDIDATES

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980. This article was numbered as articles 10 and 11 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For additional historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment of articles 1 to 13 of this title in 1980, see the editor's note immediately following the title heading for this title.

Cross references:

For election offenses relating to access to ballot by candidates, see part 4 of article 13 of this title.

Law reviews:

For article, "Constitutional Law", which discusses a Tenth Circuit decision dealing with minor party ballot access, see 61 Den. L.J. 217 (1984); for article, "Constitutional Law", which discusses a Tenth Circuit decision dealing with minor party ballot access, see 62 Den. U. L. Rev. 101 (1985).

Section

PART 1 PRIMARY ELECTIONS

PART 2 GENERAL ELECTIONS

PART 3 PRESIDENTIAL ELECTIONS

PART 4 CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTIONS

PART 5 QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE AND METHODS OF NOMINATION

PART 6 POLITICAL PARTY DESIGNATION FOR PRIMARY ELECTION

PART 7 CONVENTIONS - POLITICAL PARTY NOMINATIONS

PART 8 NOMINATION OF CANDIDATES BY PETITION

PART 9 PETITIONS FOR CANDIDACY

PART 10 WITHDRAWALS AND DISQUALIFICATIONS FROM, AND VACANCIES IN, NOMINATIONS AND DESIGNATIONS

PART 11 WRITE-IN CANDIDATES

PART 12 PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY ELECTIONS

PART 13 MINOR POLITICAL PARTIES

PART 14 DISTRICT ATTORNEY TERM LIMIT BALLOT QUESTIONS